Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.280

Territorial annexation—Election—Result.

The canvassing authority shall cause a statement of the result of such election to be forwarded to the board of park commissioners for entry on the record of the board. If the majority of the votes cast upon that question at the election shall favor annexation, the territory shall immediately become annexed to the park district, and shall thenceforth be a part of the park district, the same as though originally included in the district. The expense of such election shall be paid out of park district funds.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.61.280. Prior: (i) 1943 c 264 s 20, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6741-20, part; prior: 1907 c 98 s 20, part; RRS s 6739, part. (ii) 1943 c 264 s 21; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6741-21; prior: 1907 c 98 s 21; RRS s 6740.]